Mississippi, session 2026, SB3054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sums of money, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of support of the Center for Advanced Vehicular Systems, Center for Manufacturing Excellence, Mississippi State Chemical Laboratory, Water Resources Institute, Mississippi Law Research Institute, Jackson State University Urban Research Center, Mississippi Mineral Resources Research Institute, Research Institute of Pharmaceutical Sciences, the Supercomputer, the Stennis Institute of Government, Gulf Coast Research Laboratory, Polymer Institute, Small Business Development Center, Stennis Center for Higher Learning, the Commission for Volunteer Services, the State Court Education Program, and the executive office of the board of trustees for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $    39,805,424.00. SECTION 2.  The following sums of money, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated out of the proceeds from any federal, student fees or other special source funds not otherwise appropriated, to the Center for Advanced Vehicular Systems, Center for Manufacturing Excellence, Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of support of the Mississippi State Chemical Laboratory, Water Resources Institute, Mississippi Alcohol Safety Education Program, Stennis Institute of Government, Mississippi Law Research Institute, Mississippi Small Business Development Center, Mississippi Mineral Resources Research Institute, Research Institute of Pharmaceutical Sciences, the Supercomputer, Stennis Space Center's Center for Higher Learning, Gulf Coast Research Laboratory, Polymer Institute, Jackson State University Urban Research Center, the Commission for Volunteer Services, and the executive office of the board of trustees for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $    48,026,992.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this act hereof, the following amounts, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be expended by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the purposes hereinafter set forth: (a)  From State General Funds, for the support of: Center for Advanced Vehicular Systems for the sum of..................................... $   4,770,162.00. Supercomputer for the sum of............... $     662,749.00. Center for Manufacturing Excellence for the sum of..................................... $ 3,121,173.00. Mississippi Mineral Resources Institute for the sum of..................................... $     409,931.00. State Court Education Program for the sum of........................................ $   2,085,496.00. Mississippi Law Research Institute for the sum of........................................ $     922,966.00. Executive Office of the Board of Trustees for the sum of..................................... $   7,425,157.00. Mississippi Polymer Institute for the sum of..................................... $     929,961.00. Mississippi Small Business Development Center for the sum of.......................... $     364,613.00. Stennis Space Center - Center for Higher Learning for the sum of........................ $     366,474.00. Jackson State University Urban Research Center for the sum of.......................... $     553,605.00. Stennis Institute of Government for the sum of........................................ $     798,288.00. Commission for Volunteer Services for the sum of..................................... $   1,111,961.00. Gulf Coast Research Laboratory for the sum of........................................ $   8,664,947.00. Mississippi Water Resources Institute for the sum of........................................ $     354,278.00. Mississippi State Chemical Laboratory for the sum of........................................ $   1,913,635.00. Research Institute of Pharmaceutical Sciences for the sum of................................. $   5,350,028.00. (b)  From Special Funds, for the support of: Center for Advanced Vehicular Systems for the sum of..................................... $ 142,782.00. Center for Manufacturing Excellence for the sum of........................................ $ 142,782.00. Mississippi Mineral Resources Institute for the sum of..................................... $ 527,861.00. Mississippi State University-Alcohol Safety for the sum of................................. $   1,940,639.00. Mississippi Law Research Institute for the sum of........................................ $     345,778.00. Executive Office of the Board of Trustees for the sum of..................................... $  21,506,688.00. Mississippi Small Business Development Center for the sum of.......................... $   2,573,401.00. Commission for Volunteer Services for the sum of..................................... $   2,474,134.00. Gulf Coast Research Laboratory for the sum of........................................ $   2,074,725.00. Mississippi State Chemical Laboratory for the sum of........................................ $     506,807.00. Research Institute of Pharmaceutical Sciences for the sum of................................. $  15,791,395.00. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act and allocated to the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall allocate One Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($175,000.00) for Sea Grants matching for the Fiscal Year 2027. Provided further, it is the intention of the Legislature, in the event budget reductions are imposed on the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, as a result of the Governor ordering budget reductions under the provisions of Section 27-104-13 or 31-17-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, the same percent reduction will be applied to those state funds identified in this section for Sea Grant match. It is the intent of the Legislature that no general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. After the Mississippi State Chemical Laboratory has provided the maximum amount of services which may be provided free of charge under the provisions of Section 57-21-11(c), Mississippi Code of 1972, the laboratory shall not provide any additional services from the funds appropriated under the provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this act if any charges for such services previously provided are more than ninety (90) days past due.  After all such delinquent charges have been paid by a client, the laboratory may provide additional services to the client. SECTION 4.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act and authorized for expenditure in Section 3(b) of this act, the following amounts shall be derived from Education Enhancement Funds deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972: Center for Advanced Vehicular Systems.......$     142,782.00. Center for Manufacturing Excellence.........$     142,782.00. Gulf Coast Research Laboratory..............$     142,782.00. Executive Office of the Board of Trustees for the sum of................................. $     402,396.00. Total.......................................$ 830,742.00. SECTION 5.  None of the funds appropriated by this act shall be expended for any purpose that is not actually required or necessary for performing any of the powers or duties of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or any of the powers or duties of any institution under the jurisdiction of the board of trustees, that are authorized by the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, state or federal law, or rules or regulations that implement state or federal law. SECTION 6.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the budget requests of the individual institutes, laboratories and programs consolidated in this bill for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 7.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall report yearly to the Legislature any institution not in compliance with Section 97-11-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, which prohibits deficit spending. SECTION 8.  Any funds appropriated pursuant to this act and paid as a fee to or deposited in a financial institution shall be in compliance with Section 109 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi and Section 25-4-105, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 10.  None of the funds appropriated and/or authorized for expenditure under this act shall be used for research in which a human embryo is killed or destroyed. SECTION 11.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 12.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) is hereby provided for the National Center for Cannabis Research and Education at the University of Mississippi - Research Institute of Pharmaceutical Sciences for the purpose of data analysis, educational initiatives, and other activities in collaboration with the State Department of Health pursuant to Section 41-138-1, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 13.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 14.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed from and after June 30, 2026.